Nebraska, session 109, LB778.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 13-2706, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
13-2706 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section for a
city of the primary class, any municipality that has applied for and received a
grant of assistance under the Sports Arena Facility Financing Assistance Act
shall not receive state assistance under the Civic and Community Center
Financing Act for the same project for which the grant was awarded under the
Sports Arena Facility Financing Assistance Act.
(2) A city of the primary class shall not be eligible to receive a grant
of assistance from the Civic and Community Center Financing Act if the city has
applied for and received a grant of assistance under the Sports Arena Facility
Financing Assistance Act.
(3) Any city that has received funding under the Convention Center
Facility Financing Assistance Act shall not receive state assistance under the
Civic and Community Center Financing Act.
(4) From July 1, 2027 2023, to June 30, 2028 2024, a municipality shall be
eligible for a grant of assistance under the Civic and Community Center
Financing Act only if such municipality (a) partners with a certified creative
district and (b) is not prohibited from receiving a grant of assistance under
subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section. In awarding grants of assistance,
the department shall give preference to any municipality that is partnered with
a certified creative district. Notwithstanding the limitations on the amount of
grants of assistance in section 13-2705, the department may award grants of
assistance to qualifying municipalities in amounts set by the Nebraska Arts
Council, which shall not be less than one hundred thousand dollars. The
department shall coordinate with the Nebraska Arts Council for purposes of
setting such amounts. For purposes of this subsection, certified creative
district means a creative district certified pursuant to subdivision (5) of
section 82-312. After June 30, 2028 2024, this subsection no longer applies.
(5) Any municipality eligible for a grant of assistance as provided in
this section may apply for a grant of assistance from the fund. Any tribal
government may apply for a grant of assistance from the fund. Application shall
be made on forms developed by the department.
Sec. 2. Original section 13-2706, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
-1-